Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB498.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 156 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section:
(a) "Academic skills intake assessment" means a criterion-referenced
assessment of numeracy and literacy skills that is determined by third-party
research to be highly reliable and valid and that may be administered in
person or online;
(b) "Accredited provider" means an entity that is currently accredited by one
(1) of the seven (7) regional accreditation organizations or any successor
entity;
(c) "Approved program provider" means a public, nonprofit, or other entity
that meets the requirements of this section and does not receive federal or
state funding or private tuition for a student in the program;
(d) "Average cost per graduate" means the total program funding dispersed to
an approved program provider divided by the total number of graduates for
a cohort calculated twelve (12) months after the close of the cohort;
(e) "Career pathways coursework" means one (1) or more courses that align
with the skill needs of industries within the state or region and assist
students to enter into or advance within a specific occupation or
occupational cluster;
(f) "Career placement services" means services designed to assist students in
obtaining employment, including career interest self-assessments, job
search skills, resume development, and mock interviews;
(g) "Cohort" means students who enter the program between July 1 and June
30 of each program year;
Page 1 of 8
XXXX 1/23/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1692
(h) "Employability skills certification" means a certificate earned by
demonstrating professional nontechnical skills through assessment and
shall include the program standards of the United States Department of
Labor's Skills to Pay the Bills: Mastering Soft Skills for Workplace Success
curriculum;
(i) "Fund" means the Adult Workforce Diploma Pilot Program fund
established in subsection (3) of this section;
(j) "Graduate" means a student who has successfully completed all state and
approved program provider requirements to earn a high school diploma;
(k) "Graduation rate" means the total number of graduates from a cohort
divided by the total number of students from the same cohort calculated
twelve (12) months after the close of the cohort multiplied by one hundred
(100);
(l) "Graduation requirements" means course and credit requirements needed
to earn a high school diploma from an approved program provider that are
equivalent to the minimum requirements for high school graduation set by
the Kentucky Board of Education in accordance with KRS 156.160, except
no state-mandated testing or physical education credit shall be required;
(m) "High school diploma" means a diploma that is issued by an accredited
provider and that is recognized as a secondary school diploma by this state
and fits within the definition of a Tier 1 education credential as defined by
the United States Department of Defense;
(n) "Learning plan" means a documented plan that:
1. Is designed to prepare a student to succeed in the program and the
student's future endeavors; and
2. Identifies the courses and credits that are needed for a student to
complete the program and are approved program provider graduation
Page 2 of 8
XXXX 1/23/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1692
requirements;
(o) "Milestones" means objective measures of progress for which payment is
made to an approved program provider under this section, including earned
units of high school credit, earned industry-recognized credentials, and
earned high school diplomas;
(p) "Program" means the Adult Workforce Diploma Pilot Program;
(q) "Student" means a participant in the program who is at least twenty-one
(21) years of age, a Kentucky resident, and has not earned a high school
diploma;
(r) "Transcript evaluation" means a documented summary of credits that were
earned in previous public or private accredited high schools compared with
program and approved program provider graduation requirements;
(s) "Unit of high school credit" means a credit that is:
1. Awarded based on a student's demonstration that the student has
successfully met the content expectations for the credit area as defined
by subject area standards, expectations, or guidelines; and
2. Equivalent to one (1) full academic year or two (2) semesters of study
in a time-based system; and
(t) "Workforce credential" means a third-party credential that:
1. Is part of a sequence of credentials that can be accumulated over time
to build an individual's qualifications to advance along a career
pathway and results in an industry-recognized certificate; or
2. Verifies an individual's qualification or competence and is issued by a
third-party with the authority to issue the credential.
(2) The General Assembly hereby establishes the Adult Workforce Diploma Pilot
Program administered by the Education and Labor Cabinet to assist a person
who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age in earning a high school diploma and
Page 3 of 8
XXXX 1/23/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1692
developing critical employability and career and technical skills to prepare the
person for employment.
(3) (a) There is hereby created a trust and agency account called the Adult
Workforce Diploma Pilot Program fund to be administered by the
Education and Labor Cabinet for the purpose of funding approved program
providers in accordance with subsection (6) of this section.
(b) The fund shall contain moneys received from the general fund, federal
funds, and any other proceeds from contributions, gifts, or grants made
available for the purposes of the fund.
(c) Moneys deposited in the fund are hereby appropriated for the purposes
under this section.
(d) Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, moneys in the fund at the close of a fiscal
year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
(4) The Education and Labor Cabinet shall create a standardized form for use by
accredited providers. To be designated as an approved program provider able to
participate in the program, on or before August 15 of each year, an accredited
provider shall submit a form to the Education and Labor Cabinet showing that
the accredited provider:
(a) Is operating a regionally accredited high school diploma-granting entity;
(b) Has the ability to develop a learning plan for each student that integrates
graduation requirements and career goals;
(c) Provides a course catalog that includes all courses that are necessary to
meet graduation requirements; and
(d) Has the ability to provide the following:
1. Remediation opportunities in literacy and numeracy;
2. Career pathways coursework;
3. Preparation for workforce credentials;
Page 4 of 8
XXXX 1/23/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1692
4. Career placement services; and
5. Academic skills intake assessments and transcript evaluations.
(5) On or before October 15 of each year, the Education and Labor Cabinet shall
approve all accredited providers who meet the requirements in subsection (4) of
this section and place all approved program providers on an approved program
providers list. Approved program providers shall begin enrolling students on or
before November 15 of each year. Approved program providers shall maintain
approval status unless the approved program provider is removed from the
approved program providers list pursuant to subsection (11) of this section.
(6) The Education and Labor Cabinet shall pay approved program providers the
following amounts for each student who completes the following milestones:
(a) Two hundred seventy-five dollars ($275) for each:
1. Completed half unit of high school credit;
2. Completed employability skills certification; and
3. Earned workforce credential that requires less than fifty (50) hours of
training;
(b) Five hundred fifty dollars ($550) for each earned workforce credential that
requires at least fifty (50) hours but not more than one hundred (100) hours
of training;
(c) Eight hundred twenty-five dollars ($825) for each earned workforce
credential that requires more than one hundred (100) hours of training;
and
(d) One thousand one hundred dollars ($1,100) for each earned high school
diploma.
(7) Approved program providers shall submit monthly invoices to the Education and
Labor Cabinet not later than the tenth calendar day of each month for milestones
met in the previous calendar month. The cabinet shall pay approved program
Page 5 of 8
XXXX 1/23/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1692
providers in the order in which invoices are submitted until all available monies
are exhausted. The cabinet shall provide a written update to the approved
program providers on or before the last calendar day of each month, including:
(a) The aggregate total dollars that have been paid to approved program
providers to date;
(b) The aggregate number of students currently enrolled in the program that
have had a previously invoiced milestone;
(c) The aggregate number of newly enrolled students that have not been
included in a previous invoice; and
(d) The estimated number of enrollments still available for the program year.
(8) An approved program provider shall only invoice for courses and credits required
to earn a high school diploma which may include additional courses that meet
workforce credential requirements.
(9) On or before October 30 of each year, each approved program provider shall
report the following to the Education and Labor Cabinet:
(a) The total number of:
1. Students who were funded through the program;
2. Earned credits;
3. Earned workforce credentials earned for each tier of funding; and
4. Students who graduated through the program; and
(b) The information required by the performance measures established by the
Education and Labor Cabinet pursuant to subsection (12) of this section.
(10) The Education and Labor Cabinet shall compile the reports received from each
approved program provider in accordance with subsection (9) of this section and,
by December 15 of each year, shall provide an annual report to the:
(a) Kentucky Board of Education;
(b) Secretary of State; and
Page 6 of 8
XXXX 1/23/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1692
(c) Legislative Research Commission for referral to the:
1. Senate Committee on Economic Development, Tourism, and Labor;
and
2. House Committee on Economic Development and Workforce
Investment.
(11) (a) Beginning July 1, 2027, and each July 1 thereafter, the Education and
Labor Cabinet shall review data from each approved program provider to
ensure that each provider is achieving minimum program performance
standards, including:
1. A graduation rate of at least fifty percent (50%) beginning with the
second cohort; and
2. An average student cost per graduate of seven thousand five hundred
dollars ($7,500) or less.
(b) The Education and Labor Cabinet may implement a process to bring an
approved program provider into compliance.
(c) If the program is extended by an act of the General Assembly, the
Education and Labor Cabinet shall revoke an approved program provider's
authorization to participate in the program if the approved program
provider does not comply with the requirements of paragraph (a) of this
subsection within two (2) years. If the cabinet has revoked an approved
program provider's authorization, the provider shall be removed from the
program provider list.
(12) On or before November 1, 2027, the Education and Labor Cabinet shall
promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A
necessary to carry out this section, including but not limited to:
(a) The form required by subsection (4) of this section;
(b) Performance measures to evaluate the performance of adult education and
Page 7 of 8
XXXX 1/23/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1692
workforce development programs offered by approved program providers
that:
1. Allow for a comparable evaluation across adult education and
workforce development programs;
2. Take into consideration the variety of learning levels of adult learners
entering the programs; and
3. Include:
a. Measurements of adult learner progress toward earning a high
school diploma;
b. The number of high school diplomas earned;
c. The number of industry-recognized credentials earned;
d. The number of adult learners or graduates who have
matriculated at an institution of higher learning or
postsecondary educational institution;
e. The number of adult learners or graduates who have newly
acquired employment, went on to earn higher wages, or who
have obtained a better job or a promotion; and
f. Other relevant measures identified by the Education and Labor
Cabinet; and
(c) A compliance process for approved program providers.
(13) This section shall expire on and have no force or effect after July 1, 2029, unless
extended by an act of the General Assembly.
Page 8 of 8
XXXX 1/23/2026 10:28 AM Jacketed